Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1414.04
Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Fund; created; deposits; investment.

There is hereby created, for the use of the commission, a fund to be known
as the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Fund, to consist of such money
as appropriated to such fund by the Legislature. Any money in the fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 126;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 11.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.